src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kompas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kompas: # MLO checked
    kompas+N+Sg+Nom: kompas 
    kompas+N+Sg+Gen: kompas
    kompas+N+Sg+Acc: kompas
    kompas+N+Sg+Ill: kompassân
    kompas+N+Sg+Loc: kompassist
    kompas+N+Sg+Com: kompassáin
    kompas+N+Sg+Abe: kompasttáá
    kompas+N+Ess: kompassin 
    kompas+N+Par: kompassid 
    kompas+N+Pl+Nom: kompasseh
    kompas+N+Pl+Gen: kompassij
    kompas+N+Pl+Acc: kompassijd
    kompas+N+Pl+Ill: kompassáid
    kompas+N+Pl+Loc: kompassijn
    kompas+N+Pl+Com: [kompassijguin, kompassijgijn]
    kompas+N+Pl+Abe: kompassijttáá
